Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.010

Title of chapter.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Statewide City Employees' Retirement System Law".

[ 1947 c 71 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9592-130.]

NOTES:

Severability—1947 c 71: "If any provision of this act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the provision or application so held invalid, and for such purposes the provisions of this act are declared to be severable." [ 1947 c 71 s 26.] This applies to RCW 41.44.010 through 41.44.250.